Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 725.015 is amended to read:
725.015. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of  this section, [Nothing in ] this chapter
[shall be  construed or held to ] does not  limit [ the] a person’s  rights, powers or privileges [ granted
to any person by any ] under another  law of this state or of the United States [ whereby the loaning
of money or extending of ] that regulates lending money or extending credit [ is regulated, provided
that such person is operating in  compliance with the provisions of such law ] if the person complies
with the other law .
(2) The Legislative Assembly hereby declares that this state does not want any of  the
amendments set  forth in section 521 of the Depository Institutions Deregulation and Mone-
tary Control Act of 1980  (P.L. 96-221, 94 Stat. 132) to apply to consumer finance loans made
in this state.
(3) A person is subject to this chapter if the person engages in the  business of making
consumer finance loans of $50,000 or  less or if the person acts as an agent, broker or
facilitator for a person that engages in the business of making consumer finance loans  of
$50,000 or less to a consumer who resides in or maintains a domicile in  this state and the
consumer:
(a) Negotiates, agrees to  the terms of or enters into or executes a contract for a con-
sumer finance loan of $50,000 or less in person, by mail,  by telephone or via the Internet
while the consumer is physically present in this state; or
(b) Makes a payment on a consumer finance loan of $50,000 or less in which:
(A) A person debits an account that the consumer holds in this state  at a financial in-
stitution or trust company, as those terms are defined in ORS 706.008; or
(B) The consumer makes the payment by means of a negotiable instrument drawn on a
financial institution or trust company, as those terms are defined in ORS 706.008.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 725.120 is amended to read:
725.120. (1) [ Application] A  person may apply  for a license required under ORS 725.045 [ shall
be in writing in ] on a form  and with contents that  [ prescribed by ] the Director of  the Department
Enrolled House Bill 4116 (HB 4116-INTRO) Page 1
of Consumer and Business Services  specifies. [ The application shall contain the name and both the
residence and business addresses of each individual applicant, of each member of a partnership or as-
sociation that applies for a license and of each officer or director  of a corporation that applies for a
license. The application shall also contain the county and city with street  and number, if any, where
the business is to be conducted and any other information the director may require. ]
(2) An application under subsection (1) of this section must include:
(a) The name  of each individual applicant, of each member of a partnership or association
that applies for the license and of each director  or officer of a corporation that applies for
the license;
(b) The residential address for each individual described  in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section;
(c) The business address for each individual  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
and the street name and number, the city and the county of the physical  address, if any, at
which the applicant will conduct business under the license;
(d) A unique identifier that the applicant applies for and  receives from the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;
(e) Fingerprints  that the director or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry can send to a government agency  that has authority to lawfully use the fingerprints
to perform a statewide, nationwide or international criminal background check;
(f) A summary of the applicant’s personal history and experience on a  form and with
contents that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry specifies;
(g) A written authorization for the  Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry
to obtain, with reference to the applicant:
(A) A credit report from a consumer reporting agency, as defined in 15  U.S.C. 1681a(f),
or from a consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on  consumers on a
nationwide basis, as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(p); and
(B) Information about  administrative, civil or criminal proceedings, orders, judgments
or other official actions in any governmental jurisdiction that involve the applicant; and
(h) Any other information that the director or  the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing Sys-
tem and Registry may require.
[(2)] (3)  An applicant, at the  time the applicant applies for a license under this section, shall
pay to the  director a license fee determined under ORS 725.185 for the period terminating on the
last day of the current calendar year. If the director denies the applicant a license for cause or if
the applicant withdraws the application  after the director investigates the applicant, the director
shall refund the license fee paid under this subsection, less an amount that reflects the  director’s
administrative and investigative costs for the application.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 725.370 is amended to read:
725.370. Except as provided in ORS 725.015, this chapter does not affect loans made or payable
in other jurisdictions and lawful where made or payable.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 725.015, 725.120 and 725.370 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2026 Act apply to consumer finance loans made in this state on or after the  effective date
of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4116 (HB 4116-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House February 17, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4116 (HB 4116-INTRO) Page 3